Utah statutes.
78B-6-114.   Adoption by married persons -- Consent.

(1)  A married man who is not lawfully separated from his wife may not adopt a child without the consent of his wife, if his wife is capable of giving consent.

(2)  A married woman who is not lawfully separated from her husband may not adopt a child without his consent, if he is capable of giving his consent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

